Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.395

Failure to appoint or maintain agent—Service of process, notice, or demand.

Whenever a foreign corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state shall fail to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or whenever any such registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, or whenever the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation shall be suspended or revoked service of any process, notice, or demand upon the corporation may be made in accordance with RCW 23.95.450. Nothing contained in this section shall limit or affect the right to serve any process, notice or demand, required or permitted by law to be served upon a corporation in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4126; 1982 c 35 s 147; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 79.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.